Texas statutes.
INSURANCE CODE

TITLE 8. HEALTH INSURANCE AND OTHER HEALTH COVERAGES

SUBTITLE H. HEALTH BENEFITS AND OTHER COVERAGES FOR GOVERNMENTAL EMPLOYEES

CHAPTER 1552. LONG-TERM CARE INSURANCE FOR STATE EMPLOYEES

Sec. 1552.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter, "annuitant," "board of trustees," and "employee" have the meanings assigned by Section 1551.003.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1419, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003.

Sec. 1552.002. ESTABLISHMENT OF PROGRAM. (a) The board of trustees may establish a long-term care insurance program to provide long-term care insurance coverage for:

(1) an individual eligible to participate in the program provided by Chapter 1551 as an employee or annuitant;

(2) the spouse, parent, or grandparent of an employee or annuitant; and

(3) a parent of a spouse described by Subdivision (2).

(b) The board of trustees may not implement a long-term care insurance program unless any cost or administrative burden associated with the development of, implementation of, or communications about the program is incidental.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1419, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 158 (H.B. 392), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1552.003. ADMINISTERING FIRM. The board of trustees may select an administering firm to administer the long-term care insurance program under contract with the board.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1419, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 158 (H.B. 392), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1552.005. PROGRAM NOT PART OF OTHER GROUP COVERAGES. (a) The long-term care insurance program is not part of the group coverages offered under Chapter 1551.

(b) The state may not contribute any part of the premiums for coverage offered under this chapter.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1419, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 158 (H.B. 392), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1552.006. RULES. The board of trustees may adopt rules as necessary to implement this chapter, including rules specifying the coverage to be offered under the long-term care insurance program.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1419, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 158 (H.B. 392), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2019.